Texas statutes.
BUSINESS AND COMMERCE CODE

TITLE 4. BUSINESS OPPORTUNITIES AND AGREEMENTS

CHAPTER 53. STORE LEASES

Sec. 53.001. STORE LEASE CONTRACT. (a) A provision of a lease contract that requires a store to be open when another store located in the same shopping center is open does not apply on Sunday unless the provision specifically states that it applies on Sunday.

(b) This section applies to a contract executed before or after September 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.